Maryland, session 2026, SB0136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
3–102.
(a) Except as provided in this title or as otherwise provided by law, this title
applies to:
(1) all employees of:
(i) the principal departments within the Executive Branch of State
government;
(ii) the Maryland Insurance Administration;
(iii) the State Department of Assessments and Taxation;
(iv) the State Lottery and Gaming Control Agency;
(v) the University System of Maryland, Morgan State University,
St. Mary’s College of Maryland, and Baltimore City Community College;
(vi) the Comptroller;
– 1 –

Ch. 65 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(vii) the Maryland Transportation Authority who are not police
officers;
(viii) the State Retirement Agency;
(ix) the State Department of Education;
(x) the Maryland Environmental Service;
(xi) the Maryland School for the Deaf; and
(xii) the Office of the Public Defender;
(2) firefighters for the Martin State Airport at the rank of captain or below
who are employed by the Military Department; [and]
(3) all full–time Maryland Transportation Authority police officers at the
rank of first sergeant and below; AND
(4) POLICE OFFICERS WHO IN AN OFFICIAL CAPACITY ARE
AUTHORIZED TO MAKE ARRESTS AND ARE EMPLOYEES OF THE ALCOHOL, TOBACCO,
AND CANNABIS COMMISSION.
(b) This title does not apply to:
(13) any employee described in subsection (a)(2) OR (4) of this section who
is a supervisory, managerial, or confidential employee, as defined in regulations adopted
by the Secretary.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October July 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 2 –